Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-302
Regulations; reports; duty of department to prescribe.

The State Department of Education shall prescribe forms for making all reports and regulations for all proceedings under the general school laws of the state. The department may establish procedures for submission of forms on electronic media or via telecommunications systems. The department may require the use of a personally identifiable number, which it will assign, on electronic data submissions in lieu of requiring authorized signatures on paper forms.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision VIII, § 5, p. 363;

R.S.1913, § 6902;

C.S.1922, § 6478;

C.S.1929, § 79-1605;

R.S.1943, § 79-1608;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 28, p. 701;

Laws 1965, c. 513, § 1, p. 1633;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-307;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 130.

Under former law, authority to make rules was an unconstitutional delegation of legislative authority. School Dist. No. 39 of Washington County v. Decker, 159 Neb. 693, 68 N.W.2d 354 (1955).